Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1375
Certified collective-bargaining
agents; procedures
applicable.

Certified collective-bargaining agents
representing bargaining units other than those prescribed in section 81-1373
shall not utilize the impasse procedures provided for in sections 81-1381 to 81-1385 nor file a petition with
the commission invoking its jurisdiction as provided in the Industrial Relations
Act.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 23.

Industrial Relations Act, see section 48-801.01.